Washington statutes.
RCW 10.122.100

Exception for equipment malfunction.

(1) All or part of a custodial interrogation to which RCW 10.122.030 otherwise applies need not be recorded electronically to the extent that recording is not feasible because the available electronic recording equipment fails, despite reasonable maintenance of the equipment, and timely repair or replacement is not feasible.

(2) If both audio and video recording of a custodial interrogation are otherwise required by RCW 10.122.030, recording may be by audio alone if a technical problem in the video recording equipment prevents video recording, despite reasonable maintenance of the equipment, and timely repair or replacement is not feasible.

(3) If both audio and video recording of a custodial interrogation are otherwise required by RCW 10.122.030, recording may be by video alone if a technical problem in the audio recording equipment prevents audio recording, despite reasonable maintenance of the equipment, and timely repair or replacement is not feasible.

[ 2021 c 329 s 10.]